Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska88-543
Prohibited acts; penalty.

(1) No warehouse licensee or partner, limited liability company member, officer, or agent thereof shall:

(a) Issue a receipt for grain not actually received. If at any time there is less grain in a warehouse than outstanding receipts issued for grain, there shall be a presumption that the warehouse licensee or partner, limited liability company member, officer, or agent thereof has wrongfully removed grain, has wrongfully caused grain to be removed, or has issued receipts for grain not actually received, and has violated this section;

(b) Create a post-direct delivery storage position without issuing proper documentation consistent with rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the commission;

(c) Create a post-direct delivery storage position at any time the warehouse licensee does not have sufficient warehouse-owned grain or grain in open storage to cover the storage position created for the benefit of the producer; or

(d) Record grain as being received or loaded out that has not been physically deposited in or physically removed from the warehouse.

(2) Any warehouse licensee or partner, limited liability company member, officer, or agent thereof who knowingly and willingly violates this section shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.

Laws 1987, LB 164, § 19;

Laws 1989, LB 78, § 32;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 564;

Laws 1994, LB 884, § 94;

Laws 2005, LB 439, § 6.